District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA,
That this act may be cited as the “Malcolm X Extension of Disposition Authority and
Term Sheet Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Malcolm X Surplus Declaration and Disposition Approval Act of
2022, effective March 10, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-316; 70 DCR 848), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2(6) is amended to read as follows:
“(6) “Project” means a mixed-use project that will include approximately
150 residential units, 7,500 square feet of daycare space, and 2,000 square feet of retail
space, as further described in the amended term sheet and draft land disposition and
development agreement transmitted by the Mayor to the Council with the Malcolm X
Extension of Disposition Authority and Term Sheet Amendment Act of 2025, passed on
2nd reading on November 4, 2025 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-219).”.
(b) Section 3 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (i) is amended by striking the phrase “, as further described
in the executed term sheet and draft land disposition and development agreement
documents transmitted by the Mayor to the Council with this act.” and inserting the
phrase “as further described in the amended term sheet and draft land disposition and
development agreement transmitted by the Mayor to the Council with the Malcolm X
Extension of Disposition Authority and Term Sheet Amendment Act of 2025, passed on
2nd reading on November 4, 2025 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-219).” in its place.
(2) Subsection (j) is amended by striking the phrase “transmitted by the
Mayor with this act” and inserting the phrase “transmitted by the Mayor with the
Malcolm X Extension of Disposition Authority and Term Sheet Amendment Act of 2025,
passed on 2nd reading on November 4, 2025 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-219)” in its
place.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(c) Section 4(c) is amended by striking the phrase “2 years after the effective
date” and inserting the phrase “4 years after the effective date” in its place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the
fiscal impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act
of 1975, approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto
by the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of
congressional review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home
Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-
206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2